New York, session 2025-2026, S9553.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Jeffrey M. 2 Hogan, currently an officer of the division of state police, and who is 3 a tier 2 member of the New York state and local retirement system 4 covered under section 381-b of the retirement and social security law, 5 who between March 24, 2007 and January 3, 2013 was employed as a fire- 6 fighter by the Utica Fire Department where he was a member of the New 7 York state and local police and fire retirement system covered under 8 section 384-d of the retirement and social security law, shall be grant- 9 ed retirement service credit pursuant to section 381-b of the retirement 10 and social security law for such employment as a firefighter for the 11 Utica Fire Department as if such service was rendered with the division 12 of state police and shall be entitled to the full rights and benefits 13 associated with coverage under such section, if, on or before one year 14 after the effective date of this act, he shall file a written request to 15 that effect with the state comptroller. 16 § 2. All service costs attributable to the operation of this act shall 17 be borne by the state of New York. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: This bill would grant service credit in section 381-b of the retire- ment and social security law (RSSL) to Jeffrey M. Hogan, a Tier 2 member of the New York State and Local Police and Fire Retirement System (NYSLPFRS) employed by the division of state police, for the period March 24, 2007 through January 3, 2013 while employed as a firefighter covered under section 384-d of the RSSL. This bill will not increase the state of New York's annual contrib- utions. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14717-02-6 S. 9553 2 Insofar as this bill affects NYSLPFRS, there will be an immediate past service cost of $468,000 borne by the state of New York as a one-time payment. This cost assumes that payment will be made on March 1, 2027. Summary of relevant resources: Membership data as of March 31, 2025 was used to measure the impact of the bill, the same data used in the Actuarial Valuations dated April 1, 2025. Distributions and other statistics can be found in the 2025 Report of the Actuary and the 2025 Annual Comprehensive Financial Report. The actuarial assumptions and methods used are described in the 2025 Annual Report to the Comptroller on Actuarial Assumptions, and the Codes, Rules and Regulations of the State of New York: Audit and Control. The fair value of assets and GASB disclosures can be found in the 2025 Financial Statements and Supplementary Information. Assumptions, demographics, and other considerations may have been modified to better reflect specific provisions of any proposed benefit change(s). This fiscal note does not constitute a legal opinion on the viability of the bill, nor is it intended to serve as a substitute for the profes- sional judgment of an attorney. This estimate, dated February 26, 2026, and intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session, is Fiscal Note Number 2026-122. As Chief Actuary of the New York State and Local Retirement System (NYSLRS), I, Aaron Schottin Young, hereby certify that this analysis complies with applicable Actuarial Standards of Practice as well as the Code of Professional Conduct and Qualification Standards for Actuaries Issuing Statements of Actuarial Opinion of the American Academy of Actu- aries, of which I am a member. I am a member of NYSLRS but do not believe it impairs my objectivity.